test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-koonjal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kõõnjâl â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kõõnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kõnnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kõnnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kõnnjla
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kõnnjlest
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kõnnjlin
     kõõnjâl+N+Ess+Indef: kõnnjlen
     kõõnjâl+N+Par+Indef: kõnnjled
     kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kõnnjâltaa, kõnnjâltää]
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kõnnjâl
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kõnnjli
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kõnnjlid
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kõnnjlid
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kõnnjlin
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kõnnjlivuiʹm
     kõõnjâl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kõnnjlitaa, kõnnjlitää]
